Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-621
Contraband; disposition.

Contraband game and fish seized and confiscated in accordance with the Game Law or coming into the possession of the commission by other means shall be turned over to the nearest hospital or state institution or otherwise disposed of as directed by the commission, and all contraband hides and furs shall be sold and the proceeds paid into the State Game Fund.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VI, § 8, p. 435;

C.S.1929, § 37-608;

R.S.1943, § 37-608;

Laws 1957, c. 139, § 16, p. 472;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 38;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-608;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 311.

Pheasants legally taken in another state were not contraband. State v. Allen, 159 Neb. 314, 66 N.W.2d 830 (1954).